Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 4 of this 2022 Act:
(1) “Culturally responsive services” means services provided by an organization:
(a) Whose founding mission and  goals are aligned with the culture of the individuals,
families, businesses and communities receiving the services; and
(b) That demonstrates intimate knowledge of the lived  experience of the individuals,
families, businesses and communities receiving the services.
(2) “Economic equity risk factor” means:
(a) Experience of discrimination because of race or ethnicity;
(b) English language proficiency;
(c) Citizenship status;
(d) Socioeconomic status; or
(e) Residence or operation in a rural location.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon Business Development Department shall develop and  imple-
ment an Economic Equity Investment Program under which the department shall  award
grants to organizations that provide  culturally responsive services to support economic sta-
bility, self-sufficiency, wealth building and  economic equity among disadvantaged individuals,
families, businesses and communities in this state.
(2)(a) The department shall prescribe the form and manner  in which an organization may
apply for a grant under the program.
(b) An  organization’s application must demonstrate a proven ability to provide services
as described in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) Grant moneys shall be awarded  to organizations only for proposals to provide out-
reach, support and resources to individuals, families, businesses or communities  whose fu-
ture is  at risk because of any combination of two or more economic equity risk factors in
order to improve economic equity as measured by:
(a) Ownership of land, principal residences and other real property;
(b) Entrepreneurship;
(c) Business development;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1579 (SB 1579-A) Page 1
(d) Workforce development; and
(e) Intergenerational wealth building, such as savings,  investments and real property
equity.
(4) Upon request, the department shall provide technical assistance to organizations that
receive grant  moneys under the program and may consult with an organization about the
organization’s needs to maintain capacity to carry  out the proposal for which the grant
moneys were awarded.
SECTION 3.
(1)(a) The Oregon Business Development Department  shall conduct biennial
evaluations of the  services provided in the preceding 24-month period by organizations that
are funded with grant moneys under the Economic  Equity Investment Program developed
and implemented under section 2 of this 2022 Act.
(b) Each biennial evaluation shall measure the outcomes achieved by such  services in
light of current  research into the measures of economic equity described in section 2 (3) of
this 2022 Act and culturally responsive services.
(2) Not later  than September 15 of each even-numbered year, the department shall pro-
vide a report, in the manner required under ORS 192.245, to  the interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to economic development, that sets forth:
(a) The results of the most recent  evaluation conducted under subsection (1) of this
section;
(b) The increase in the capacity of the  organizations receiving grant moneys to provide
the services for which the grants were awarded; and
(c) Any other information the department considers important  to enable the committees
to assess the success of the program.
SECTION 4. (1) There is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct  from
the General Fund, the Economic Equity Investment Fund.  Interest earned by the Economic
Equity Investment Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) All moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to  the Oregon Business Devel-
opment Department  for the purposes of developing and implementing the Economic Equity
Investment Program under sections 1 to 4 of this 2022 Act.
(3) Moneys in the fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly;
(b) Moneys otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly  or the Oregon
Business Development Department;
(c) Interest earned upon moneys in the fund; and
(d) Other moneys or property transferred to the fund from any public or  private source.
(4) The department may accept for  deposit in the fund any grant, donation, gift or be-
quest of moneys or property from any public or private source.
SECTION 5.
There is appropriated to the Oregon  Business Development Department, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $15,000,000 for
deposit in the Economic Equity Investment Fund established under section 4 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$15,000,000 is established for the biennium ending  June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Oregon Business Development  Department from the Economic
Equity Investment Fund established under section 4 of this 2022 Act for  the purpose of car-
rying out the provisions of sections 1 to 4 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 7. (1) Sections 1 to 4 of this 2022 Act become operative on January 1, 2023.
(2) The Director of the  Oregon Business Development Department may take any action
before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable
the director to exercise, on  and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this
section, the duties, functions and  powers of the director under sections 1 to 4 of this 2022
Act.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1579 (SB 1579-A) Page 2
SECTION 8. This 2022 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2022
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by Senate February 28, 2022
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House March 3, 2022
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1579 (SB 1579-A) Page 3